tr: Çin zili kenar şekli: Derin flanş; Düz/düşük profilli çin; Ters çin (kenarı aşağıda); Sığ flanş; Swish stili; Geleneksel kıvrık kenar; Wuhan stili; Diğer
hu: Kínai cintányér peremformája: Mély perem; Lapos/alacsony profilú; Fordított (lefelé hajló peremű); Sekély perem; Swish stílusú; Hagyományos, felfelé hajló peremű; Wuhan stílusú; Egyéb
zh-TW: 中國鈸邊緣形狀: 深凸緣; 扁平/低平中國鈸; 反向中國鈸 (邊緣朝下); 淺凸緣; Swish 樣式; 傳統上翹邊緣; 武漢樣式; 其他
nl: China cymbal randvorm: Diepe flens; Platte/low-profile china; Omgekeerde china (rand omlaag); Ondiepe flens; Swish-stijl; Traditionele opstaande rand; Wuhan-stijl; Anders
fr: Forme du bord de la cymbale china: Rebord profond; Chinoise plate/à profil bas; Chinoise inversée (bord vers le bas); Rebord peu profond; Style swish; Bord retourné traditionnel; Style Wuhan; Autre
ko: 차이나 심벌 가장자리 형상: 딥 플랜지; 플랫/로우 프로파일 차이나; 인버티드 차이나(가장자리 하향); 섈로우 플랜지; 스위시 스타일; 전통적인 업턴 가장자리; 우한 스타일; 기타
th: รูปทรงขอบฉาบจีน: ขอบลึก; ไชน่าแบน/ขอบเตี้ย; ไชน่ากลับหัว (ขอบลง); ขอบตื้น; สไตล์ Swish; ขอบเชิดขึ้นแบบดั้งเดิม; สไตล์อู่ฮั่น; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: China lėkštės krašto forma: Gili atbraila; Plokščia / žemo profilio; Apversta (kraštas žemyn); Sekli atbraila; „Swish“ stiliaus; Tradicinis užriestas kraštas; „Wuhan“ stiliaus; Kita
bg-BG: Форма на ръба на China чинел: Дълбок фланец; Плосък/нископрофилен чайна чинел; Обърнат чайна чинел (с ръба надолу); Плитък фланец; Тип Swish; Традиционен обърнат нагоре ръб; Тип Wuhan; Друго
pl: Kształt krawędzi talerza china: Głęboki kołnierz; Płaska / niskoprofilowa china; Odwrócona china (krawędzią w dół); Płytki kołnierz; Typu swish; Tradycyjna krawędź wywinięta do góry; Typu Wuhan; Inny
sv: Kantform på kinacymbaler: Djup fläns; Platt/lågprofilschina; Inverterad china (kanten nedåt); Grund fläns; Swish-stil; Traditionell uppåtvänd kant; Wuhan-stil; Annan
ja: チャイナシンバルエッジのShapes: ディープフランジ; フラット/ロープロファイルチャイナ; インバーテッドチャイナ (エッジダウン); シャローフランジ; スウィッシュスタイル; トラディショナルアップターンドエッジ; 武漢スタイル; その他
el: Σχήμα ακμής κυμβάλου Κίνας: Βαθιά φλάντζα; Επίπεδο/χαμηλού προφίλ china; Ανεστραμμένο china (χείλος προς τα κάτω); Ρηχή φλάντζα; Στιλ swish; Παραδοσιακό ανασηκωμένο χείλος; Στιλ Wuhan; Άλλο
es: Tipo de borde del platillo china: Pestaña profunda; Plano/perfil bajo; Invertido (borde hacia abajo); Pestaña poco profunda; Estilo swish; Borde tradicional hacia arriba; Estilo Wuhan; Otro
de: Form des China-Beckenrands: Tiefe Krempe; Flaches/Low-Profile-China; Invertiertes China (Rand nach unten); Flache Krempe; Swish-Stil; Traditionell hochgebogener Rand; Wuhan-Stil; Sonstige
sl-SI: Oblike kitajskih činel: Globok rob; Ploščata/nizkoprofilna china; Obrnjena china (rob navzdol); Plitek rob; Slog swish; Tradicionalno obrnjen rob; Slog wuhan; Drugo
zh-CN: 中国钹边缘形状: 深折边; 扁平/低矮型中国镲; 倒置中国镲（边缘向下）; 浅折边; Swish 风格; 传统上翻边缘; 武汉风格; 其他
ru: Форма края чайна-тарелки: Глубокий фланец; Плоская / низкопрофильная чайна; Перевернутая чайна (край вниз); Мелкий фланец; В стиле Swish; Традиционный загнутый вверх край; В стиле Wuhan; Другая
pt-PT: Forma da borda do prato chinês: Flange profunda; China plano/perfil baixo; China invertido (borda para baixo); Flange rasa; Estilo swish; Borda virada para cima tradicional; Estilo Wuhan; Outro
vi: Hình dạng cạnh chũm chọe Trung Quốc: Viền sâu; China phẳng/viền thấp; China ngược (viền hướng xuống); Viền nông; Kiểu Swish; Viền hếch truyền thống; Kiểu Vũ Hán; Khác
ro-RO: Formă margine pentru cinele chinezești: Flanșă adâncă; China plat/cu profil redus; China inversat (marginea în jos); Flanșă superficială; Stil Swish; Margine curbată în sus tradițională; Stil Wuhan; Altele
nb: Former på kinesiske cymbalkanter: Dyp flens; Flat / lavprofil-china; Invertert china (kant ned); Grunn flens; Swish-stil; Tradisjonell oppovervendt kant; Wuhan-stil; Annen
cs: Tvar hrany čínských činelů: Hluboký okraj; Plochá / nízkoprofilová china; Obrácená china (okraj dolů); Mělký okraj; Ve stylu swish; Tradiční zahnutý okraj; Ve stylu wuhan; Jiné
it: Shapes del bordo del piatto cinese: Flangia profonda; China piatto/ribassato; China invertito (bordo verso il basso); Flangia poco profonda; Stile swish; Bordo rialzato tradizionale; Stile Wuhan; Altro
fi: Kiinasymbaalin reunan muoto: Syvä laippa; Litteä / matalaprofiilinen china; Käännetty china (reuna alaspäin); Matala laippa; Swish-tyylinen; Perinteinen ylöspäin käännetty reuna; Wuhan-tyylinen; Muu
en: China cymbal edge shape: Deep flange; Flat/low-profile china; Inverted china (edge down); Shallow flange; Swish-style; Traditional upturned edge; Wuhan-style; Other
hr-HR: Oblik ruba kineskih činela: Duboki prirub; Ravna / niskog profila; Obrnuta china (rub prema dolje); Plitki prirub; Stil swish; Tradicionalni uzdignuti rub; Stil wuhan; Ostalo
da: Kantform på china-bækken: Dyb flange; Flad/lavprofil china; Omvendt china (kant nedad); Lav flange; Swish-stil; Traditionel opadvendt kant; Wuhan-stil; Andet
sk-SK: Tvar okraja čínskych činelov: Hlboká príruba; Plochá/nízkoprofilová china; Obrátená china (okraj nadol); Plytká príruba; Štýl swish; Tradičný okraj nahor; Štýl Wuhan; Iné
pt-BR: Formato da borda dos címbalos chineses: Borda profunda; China plano/de perfil baixo; China invertido (borda para baixo); Borda rasa; Estilo swish; Borda tradicional virada para cima; Estilo wuhan; Outro